Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 1. Trial Generally

§ 6501.
Rights of accused.

On the trial of an information or indictment, the party accused may defend himself or herself, be heard by counsel, produce witnesses and proofs in his or her favor, and shall be confronted with the witnesses produced against him or her.

§ 6502.
Presumption of innocence.

The presumption of innocence in criminal causes shall attend the accused until the jury renders a verdict of guilty, and the court shall charge the jury accordingly.
This presumption of innocence is a proper subject of comment in argument.

§ 6503.
Repealed. 1971, No. 161 (Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. date, see note set out below.

§ 6504.
Employment of counsel on behalf of State.

In the examination of a person charged with a crime exceeding the jurisdiction of a Criminal Division of the Superior Court to try and determine, commenced upon the complaint of a complaining officer not entitled to draw a salary, and in the trial of person before such court upon the complaint of such an officer, charging him or her with a crime within the jurisdiction of such court to try and determine, where the fine is payable to the State, such officer may employ counsel at the expense of the State, when the State’s Attorney is disqualified or unable seasonably to attend at such examination or trial.

HISTORY:

Amended 1965, No. 194, § 10, operative February 1, 1967; 1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 53, eff. April 9, 1974; 2009, No. 154, § 238.

§ 6505.
Payment.

The Commissioner of Finance and Management shall allow counsel so employed a reasonable compensation for his or her services and expenses and shall issue his or her warrant for the amount allowed. Compensation shall not be allowed where it appears to the Commissioner that the prosecution was superfluous and instituted to enhance costs, nor in the trial of a person upon a complaint for intoxication or for any other offense against the title relating to alcoholic beverages, except where the respondent pleads not guilty.

HISTORY:

Amended 1959, No. 329 (Adj. Sess.), § 8; 2017, No. 83, § 146.

§§ 6506,
6507.
Repealed. 1973, No. 118, § 25, eff. Oct. 1, 1973.